Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3

Produce Safety [Effective until June 30, 2021]

53-1-301.
Part definitions. [Effective until June 30, 2021.]

As used in this part:

“Administration” means the United States food and drug administration;

“Department” means the department of agriculture; and

“Standards” means the standards for the growing, harvesting, packing, and holding of produce for human consumption (21 CFR Part 112).

Acts 2018, ch. 854, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 854 § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, § 53-1-304.

53-1-302. State cooperation with United States food and drug administration.
[Effective until June 30, 2021.]

The department is authorized to cooperate with the administration under the standards.

In furtherance of its responsibilities under this part the department may:

Conduct inspections and take other actions reasonably necessary to assist the administration in enforcing the standards;

Enter into cooperative agreements with the administration to implement provisions of the standards; and

Promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this part, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 854, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 854 § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, § 53-1-304.

53-1-303.
Use of state funds — Funds limited to those provided to state by federal government. [Effective until June 30, 2021.]

No state funds shall be expended for the purposes of enforcing the standards against agricultural producers that only make sales of produce to:

The consumer of the produce; or

A restaurant or retail food establishment that is located in this state or not more than two hundred seventy-five (275) miles away from the farm where the produce was produced.

The department shall not expend more funds to cooperate with the administration under the standards than the amount of funds that are provided to this state by the federal government for such purposes.

Acts 2018, ch. 854, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 854 § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, § 53-1-304.

53-1-304. Repealer. [Effective until June 30, 2021.]

This part shall cease to be effective on June 30, 2021.

Acts 2018, ch. 854, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 854 § 2. May 3, 2018.